Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 13. State Election Campaigns.
Sec. 15.13.390.
Civil penalty; late filing of required reports.

A person who

fails to register when required by AS

15.13.050(a)

or who fails to file a properly completed and certified report within the time required by AS

15.13.040

,

15.13.060(b)

— (d),

15.13.110(a)(1)

, (3), or (4), (e), or (f) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $50 a day for each day the delinquency continues as determined by the commission subject to right of appeal to the superior court. A person who fails to file a properly completed and certified report within the time required by AS

15.13.110(a)(2)

or

15.13.110(b)

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500 a day for each day the delinquency continues as determined by the commission subject to right of appeal to the superior court;

whether as a contributor or intermediary, delays in reporting a contribution as required by AS

15.13.040(r)

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 a day for each day the delinquency continues as determined by the commission subject to right of appeal to the superior court;

whether as a contributor or intermediary, misreports or fails to disclose the true source of a contribution in violation of AS

15.13.040(r)

or

15.13.074(b)

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than the amount of the contribution that is the subject of the misreporting or failure to disclose; upon a showing that the violation was intentional, a civil penalty of not more than three times the amount of the contribution in violation may be imposed; these penalties as determined by the commission are subject to right of appeal to the superior court;

violates a provision of this chapter, except as otherwise specified in this section, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $50 a day for each day the violation continues as determined by the commission, subject to right of appeal to the superior court; and

is assessed a civil penalty may submit to the commission an affidavit stating facts in mitigation; however, the imposition of the penalties prescribed in this section or in AS

15.13.380

does not excuse that person from registering or filing reports required by this chapter.

When an administrative complaint has been filed under AS

15.13.380

, the commission shall give the respondent due notice and an opportunity to be heard. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the commission determines that the respondent engaged in the alleged violation, the commission shall assess

civil penalties under (a) of this section;

the commission’s costs of investigation and adjudication; and

reasonable attorney fees.

The commission’s determination under (b) of this section may be appealed to the superior court under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

When an action has been filed in the superior court under AS

15.13.380

, upon proof of the violation, the court shall enter a judgment in the amount of the civil penalty authorized to be collected by (a) of this section.

If the commission or superior court finds that the violation was not a repeat violation or was not part of a series or pattern of violations, was inadvertent, was quickly corrected, and had no adverse effect on the campaign of another, the commission or the court may

suspend imposition of the penalties; and

order the penalties set aside if the person does not engage in a similar violation for a period of one year.

A party who has filed a civil action under AS

15.13.380

is not entitled to trial by jury on the civil action;

is not entitled to be represented by legal counsel at public expense.

History.

(§ 6 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1995; am §§ 22, 23 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 1 TSSLA 2002; § 15, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

15.13.125

. Renumbered in 2000, at which time “AS

15.13.380

” was substituted for “AS

15.13.120

” in subsections (a), (b), (d), and (f) in order to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS

15.13.120

.

In 2020, in paragraphs (a)(2) and (3), “ AS

15.13.040(r)

” was substituted for “ AS

15.13.040(s)

” to reflect the relettering of that subsection. Paragraphs (a)(2) and (3) were added by 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2. To conform the initiative to the style of the Alaska Statutes, minor editorial changes were made including substituting semicolons for the internal periods in the paragraphs and minor wording changes were made, including inserting “a person who” as the lead-in to the paragraphs (a)(1) – (5), deleting “a person who” from paragraphs (a)(2) – (4) and rewording (a)(5) to avoid the use of the passive voice.

Cross references. —

For criminal penalties for violations of this chapter, see
AS 15.56.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (a), added the (a)(1), (4), and (5) designations, added (a)(2) and (3), in (a)(4), deleted “A person who” at the beginning, and “a provision requiring registration or filing of a report within a time required” following “except”, in (a)(5), at the beginning,
substituted “is assessed a civil penalty may submit to the commission an affidavit stating facts in mitigation; however,” for “. An affidavit stating facts in mitigation may be submitted to the commission by a person against whom a civil penalty is assessed. However”.

Sec. 15.13.400.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“candidate”

means an individual who files for election to the state legislature, for governor, for lieutenant governor, for municipal office, for retention in judicial office, or for constitutional convention delegate, or who campaigns as a write-in candidate for any of these offices; and

when used in a provision of this chapter that limits or prohibits the donation, solicitation, or acceptance of campaign contributions, or limits or prohibits an expenditure, includes

a candidate’s campaign treasurer and a deputy campaign treasurer;

a member of the candidate’s immediate family;

a person acting as agent for the candidate;

the candidate’s campaign committee; and

a group that makes expenditures or receives contributions with the authorization or consent, express or implied, or under the control, direct or indirect, of the candidate;

“commission” means the Alaska Public Offices Commission;

“communication” means an announcement or advertisement disseminated through print or broadcast media, including radio, television, cable, and satellite, the Internet, or through a mass mailing, excluding those placed by an individual or nongroup entity and costing $500 or less and those that do not directly or indirectly identify a candidate or proposition, as that term is defined in AS

15.13.065(c)

;

“contribution”

means a purchase, payment, promise or obligation to pay, loan or loan guarantee, deposit or gift of money, goods, or services for which charge is ordinarily made, and includes the payment by a person other than a candidate or political party, or compensation for the personal services of another person, that is rendered to the candidate or political party, and that is made for the purpose of

influencing the nomination or election of a candidate;

influencing a ballot proposition or question; or

supporting or opposing an initiative proposal application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

;

does not include

services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a political party, candidate, or ballot proposition or question;

ordinary hospitality in a home;

two or fewer mass mailings before each election by each political party describing members of the party running as candidates for public office in that election, which may include photographs, biographies, and information about the candidates;

the results of a poll limited to issues and not mentioning any candidate, unless the poll was requested by or designed primarily to benefit the candidate;

any communication in the form of a newsletter from a legislator to the legislator’s constituents, except a communication expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate or a newsletter or material in a newsletter that is clearly only for the private benefit of a legislator or a legislative employee;

a fundraising list provided without compensation by one candidate or political party to a candidate or political party; or

an opportunity to participate in a candidate forum provided to a candidate without compensation to the candidate by another person and for which a candidate is not ordinarily charged;

“dark money” means a contribution whose source or sources, whether from wages, investment income, inheritance, or revenue generated from selling goods or services, is not disclosed to the public; notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent a membership organization receives dues or contributions of less than $2,000 per person per year, the organization itself shall be considered the true source;

“electioneering communication” means a communication that

directly or indirectly identifies a candidate;

addresses an issue of national, state, or local political importance and attributes a position on that issue to the candidate identified; and

occurs within the 30 days preceding a general or municipal election;

“expenditure”

means a purchase or a transfer of money or anything of value, or promise or agreement to purchase or transfer money or anything of value, incurred or made for the purpose of

influencing the nomination or election of a candidate or of any individual who files for nomination at a later date and becomes a candidate;

use by a political party;

the payment by a person other than a candidate or political party of compensation for the personal services of another person that are rendered to a candidate or political party;

influencing the outcome of a ballot proposition or question; or

supporting or opposing an initiative proposal application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

;

does not include a candidate’s filing fee or the cost of preparing reports and statements required by this chapter;

includes an express communication and an electioneering communication, but does not include an issues communication;

“express communication” means a communication that, when read as a whole and with limited reference to outside events, is susceptible of no other reasonable interpretation but as an exhortation to vote for or against a specific candidate;

“group” means

every state and regional executive committee of a political party;

any combination of two or more individuals acting jointly who organize for the principal purpose of influencing the outcome of one or more elections and who take action the major purpose of which is to influence the outcome of an election; a group that makes expenditures or receives contributions with the authorization or consent, express or implied, or under the control, direct or indirect, of a candidate shall be considered to be controlled by that candidate; a group whose major purpose is to further the nomination, election, or candidacy of only one individual, or intends to expend more than 50 percent of its money on a single candidate, shall be considered to be controlled by that candidate and its actions done with the candidate’s knowledge and consent unless, within 10 days from the date the candidate learns of the existence of the group the candidate files with the commission, on a form provided by the commission, an affidavit that the group is operating without the candidate’s control; a group organized for more than one year preceding an election and endorsing candidates for more than one office or more than one political party is presumed not to be controlled by a candidate; however, a group that contributes more than 50 percent of its money to or on behalf of one candidate shall be considered to support only one candidate for purposes of AS

15.13.070

, whether or not control of the group has been disclaimed by the candidate; and

any combination of two or more individuals acting jointly who organize for the principal purpose of filing an initiative proposal application under AS

15.45.020

or who file an initiative proposal application under AS

15.45.020

;

“immediate family” means the spouse, parent, child, including a stepchild and an adopted child, and sibling of an individual;

“independent expenditure” means an expenditure that is made without the direct or indirect consultation or cooperation with, or at the suggestion or the request of, or with the prior consent of, a candidate, a candidate’s campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer, or another person acting as a principal or agent of the candidate;

“individual” means a natural person;

“issues communication” means a communication that

directly or indirectly identifies a candidate; and

addresses an issue of national, state, or local political importance and does not support or oppose a candidate for election to public office;

“nongroup entity” means a person, other than an individual, that takes action the major purpose of which is to influence the outcome of an election, and that

cannot participate in business activities;

does not have shareholders who have a claim on corporate earnings; and

is independent from the influence of business corporations.

“outside-funded entity” means an entity that makes one or more independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections and that, during the previous 12-month period, received more than 50 percent of its aggregate contributions from true sources, or their equivalents, who, at the time of the contribution, resided or had their principal place of business outside Alaska;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

, and includes a labor union, nongroup entity, and a group;

“political party” means any group that is a political party under AS

15.80.010

and any subordinate unit of that group if, consistent with the rules or bylaws of the political party, the unit conducts or supports campaign operations in a municipality, neighborhood, house district, or precinct;

“publicly funded entity” means a person, other than an individual, that receives half or more of the money on which it operates during a calendar year from government, including a public corporation;

“true source” means the person or legal entity whose contribution is funded from wages, investment income, inheritance, or revenue generated from selling goods or services; a person or legal entity who derived funds via contributions, donations, dues, or gifts is not the true source, but rather an intermediary for the true source; notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent a membership organization receives dues or contributions of less than $2,000 per person per year, the organization itself shall be considered the true source.

History.

(§ 24 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 39 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 25, 26 ch 1 SLA 2002; am §§ 8, 9 ch 1 TSSLA 2002; am § 7 ch 3 SLA 2002; am §§ 18, 19 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 2006; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 73 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 2014; §§ 16 — 19, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs in this subsection were renumbered in 2002 and 2020 to maintain alphabetical order. Renumbered in 2002 to retain alphabetical order. In 2010, in paragraph (15), “
AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “
AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS 15.60.010.

Paragraphs (5), (15), and (19) were added by 2020 General Ballot Measure No. 2. To conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes, minor editorial changes were made including substituting semicolons for internal periods in the paragraphs.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, made stylistic changes in (9).

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (4)(B)(iii), substituted “describing members of the party running as candidates for public office in that election” for “describing the party’s slate of candidates for election”, following “each political party” and deleted “party’s” following “information about the”; added (17) [now(5)], (18) [now (19)] and (19) [now(15)]).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16,
ch. 73, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments of the provisions of paragraphs (4), (6), and (8) of this section that relate to initiative proposals apply “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under
AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The statutory limit under AS

15.13.070(a)

is applicable to “control groups” under former AS

15.13.130

.
Exempting such groups from the contribution limit would seriously undermine the statute’s primary purpose of deterring the buying of elections and the undue influence of large contributors.
June 15, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.